Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.810

Dairy/forage and agricultural research facility—Rainier school farm—Revolving fund—Lease of herd, lands, authorized.

(1) Washington State University shall establish and operate a dairy/forage and agricultural research facility at the Rainier school farm.

(2) Local funds generated through operation of this facility shall be managed in a revolving fund, established herewith, by the university. This fund shall consist of all moneys received in connection with the operation of the facility and any moneys appropriated to the fund by law. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the president of the university or the president's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, this fund, to be known as the dairy/forage facility revolving fund, shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

(3) In the event state funding is not sufficient to operate the dairy cattle herd, the university is authorized to lease the herd, together with the land necessary to maintain the same, for such period and upon such terms as the university board of regents shall deem proper.

[ 1988 c 57 s 1; 1981 c 238 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—Liabilities, rights, actions, contracts—1981 c 238: See notes following RCW 72.01.140.